Connecticut, session 2026, SB00014.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of five hundred thousand dollars be appropriated to the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, from the
General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the state-wide
narcotics task force.